Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.050

Garnishment of money held by officer—Of judgment debtor—Of personal representative.

A sheriff or other peace officer who holds money of the defendant is subject to garnishment, excepting only for money or property taken from a person arrested by such officer, at the time of the arrest. A judgment debtor of the defendant is subject to garnishment when the judgment has not been previously assigned on the record or by writing filed in the office of the clerk of the court that entered the judgment and minuted by the clerk as an assignment in the execution docket. An executor or administrator is subject to garnishment for money due from the decedent to the defendant.

[ 1987 c 442 s 1005; 1927 c 101 s 1; 1886 p 43 s 19; RRS s 664. Prior: Code 1881 ss 174-192; 1877 pp 35-40; 1873 pp 43-50; 1871 pp 9, 10; 1869 pp 41-47; 1863 pp 112-120; 1860 pp 30-36; 1854 pp 155-162. Formerly RCW 7.12.180.]